Massachusetts, session 194th, H3984.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 29 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting, after
Section 2JJJJJJ, the following section:-
Section 2KKKKKK. (a) There shall be established and set up on the books of the
commonwealth a separate fund, to be known as the Dredge Material Fund. It shall consist of
amounts credited to the fund in accordance with this section. The commissioner of the
department of environmental protection shall be the custodian of the fund.
(b) The fund shall consist of: (i) fees collected from dredging permits issued under
chapter 91; (ii) contributions from municipalities and private participants pursuant to section 65
of said chapter 91; (iii) state and federal grant for coastal resilience and restoration projects; (iv)
revenue from appropriations or other money authorized by the general court and specifically
of 4

designated to be credited to the fund; and (v) interest earned on money in the fund. Amounts
credited to the fund shall not be subject to further appropriation and any money remaining in the
fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not revert to the General Fund.
(c) Money in the fund shall be expended to carry out the goals of the comprehensive
program established in section 65 of chapter 91 to promote the beneficial use of dredged
materials for coastal restoration, including beach nourishment, marshland enhancement and the
restoration of intercoastal islands to improve coastal resilience, mitigate climate impacts, reclaim
historic habitat and protect public and private interests.
(d) The department of environmental protection shall annually, not later than December
31, report on the activity of the fund to the: (i) chairs of the joint committee on environment and
natural resources; (ii) house and senate committees on ways and means; and (iii) clerks of the
house of representatives and senate.
SECTION 2. Chapter 91 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding the following
section:-
Section 65. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall, unless the
context clearly requires otherwise, have the following meanings:
“Beneficial use”, the use of dredged materials to achieve environmental, economic or
social benefits, including but not limited to: habitat creation, shoreline stabilization and erosion
control.
“Dredged materials”, sediment, sand or other materials removed from water bodies
during dredging operations authorized under this section.
of 4

“Intercoastal islands”, landforms situated within coastal water bodies that provide
ecological, recreational or protective functions.
(b) The department shall establish a program to promote the beneficial use of dredged
materials for coastal restoration, including beach nourishment, marshland enhancement and the
restoration of intercoastal islands to improve coastal resilience, mitigate climate impacts, reclaim
historic habitat and protect public and private interests. The program shall: (i) identify and
catalog potential sites for the beneficial reuse of dredged materials, prioritizing intercoastal
islands, beaches and marshlands; (ii) facilitate the redistribution of dredged materials across
municipalities within a county to ensure equitable access and maximize environmental and
economic benefits; and (iii) develop guidelines for the transportation, storage and placement of
dredged materials to minimize environmental impacts.
(c) Municipalities and private entities, including beach associations, may opt into the
program by submitting a request to the department. Municipalities and private entities that opt
into the program shall: (i) provide a plan outlining the proposed use of dredged materials,
including projected benefits; and (ii) contribute a portion of project costs, as determined by the
department, based on available funding and project scope.
(d) This section shall be funded by the Dredge Material Fund established in section
2KKKKKK of chapter 29.
(e) All activities under this section shall comply with section 40 of chapter 131 to ensure
the protection of wetlands and adherence to environmental standards.
(f) The department shall prepare an annual report on the program established in this
section that shall include: (i) the amount and type of dredged materials reused; (ii) the locations
of 4

and outcomes of restoration projects in the commonwealth; (iii) all financial expenditures and
funding sources; (iv) any recommendations for improvements to the program. The annual report
shall be submitted, not later than December 31, to the chairs of the joint committee on
environment and natural resources and the clerks of the house of representatives and senate.
(g) The department shall, pursuant to chapter 30A, promulgate rules and regulations to
implement the provisions of this section within 12 months of its effective date. The program
established in this section shall commence operations no later than 18 months after the effective
date.
of 4